Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5315YH (1) 91 ms/js H.F. 2320 Section 1. Section 414.1, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) Notwithstanding subparagraph (2), 3 a city may adopt an ordinance requiring registration of a 4 short-term rental property. The city may apply penalties for 5 failure to register. A city may consider a short-term rental 6 property to be lodging for purposes of collecting the hotel and 7 motel tax pursuant to chapter 423A. 8